Maryland, session 2025, HB0766.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
1–102.
(c) (1) Unless otherwise provided by this article, each advisory commission
created by law consists of five members appointed by the Governor, with the advice of the
Secretary, to serve at the pleasure of the Governor.
(2) (i) 1. Subject to subsubparagraph 2 of this subparagraph, the
Wildlife Advisory Commission is composed of 10 members appointed by the Governor.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0766*

HOUSE BILL 766
2. The Governor shall appoint one member who is an
academic researcher with expertise in wildlife biology, wildlife conservation, wildlife
management, or ecology.
(ii) 1. [The] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 2
OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH, THE Governor shall solicit nominations for vacancies on the
Wildlife Advisory Commission from individuals or organizations that promote the future of
hunting and individuals or organizations that promote the preservation of wildlife in the
State, with geographical distribution being a prime consideration for filling vacancies.
2. There shall be representation from:
A. The farming community, SELECTED FROM A LIST OF
CANDIDATES PROVIDED BY THE MARYLAND FARM BUREAU;
B. The hunting community;
C. The wildlife preservation community; and
D. The passive wildlife recreation community.
(iii) The term of a member is 4 years.
(iv) A member may not serve more than 2 terms on the Commission.
(v) The terms of members are staggered so that:
1. 3 shall end in 2023;
2. 3 shall end in 2024;
3. 3 shall end in 2025; and
4. 1 shall end in 2028.
(vi) At the end of a term, a member continues to serve until a
successor is appointed and qualifies.
(vii) A member who is appointed after a term has begun serves only
for the rest of the term and until a successor is appointed and qualifies.
(3) A member shall be knowledgeable in the area of interest of the advisory
commission on which he serves.
(4) Each advisory commission shall advise the Secretary or the
administration of the appropriate Department unit, pursuant to rules and regulations the
Secretary adopts.

HOUSE BILL 766 3
(5) The members of each advisory commission annually shall elect a
chairman of the commission and may adopt procedures to conduct its meetings.
(6) An advisory commission member receives the compensation provided
in the Department budget. Every member shall be reimbursed for necessary travel
expenses incurred in performing any official duty, pursuant to rules and regulations the
Secretary adopts.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.